Rhode Island, session 2025, SB963.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
(a) Any residential property that has been issued an occupancy permit on or after January
1, 1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a
governmental unit or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation restricting either or
both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or the incomes of the occupants of the
property is,:
(1) At least forty percent (40%) of the rental dwelling units in the property to levels
affordable to households at or below eighty percent (80%) statewide area median income, adjusted
for family size; or
(2) At least thirty percent (30%) of the rental dwelling units in the property to levels
affordable to households at or below sixty percent (60%) statewide area median income, adjusted
for family size, as established by § 45-53-3 are subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of
the property’s previous years’ gross scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined
by each municipality.
(b) Any residential rental housing that is created by converting an existing building, from
non-residential use, and is issued an occupancy permit, shall be subject to a fixed percentage of the

prior year’s gross scheduled rental income for the following thirty (30) years as outlined below:
Year Schedule
1 8%
2 8%
3 8%
4 8%
5 8%
6 8%
7 8%
8 8%
9 8%
10 8%
11 8%
12 8%
13 8%
14 8%
15 8%
16 10%
17 10%
18 10%
19 10%
20 10%
21 12%
22 12%
23 12%
24 12%
25 12%
26 12%
27 12%
28 12%
29 12%
30 12%
(c) The term “residential property” as used in this section shall not include any portion of
a mixed-use building that is not used as a residence or in service of a residence. In those instances,
LC001613 - Page 2 of 4

property owners shall provide evidence deemed necessary by the local assessor to demonstrate the
fractional portion of each property that should be taxed at the appropriate non-residential rate. The
assessor shall then tax the residential portion at the appropriate rate set in subsections (a) or (b) of
this section, and the remainder at the appropriate non-residential rate.
(d) For those properties that have been approved for tax treatment under this section by an
assessor as of December 31, 2024, the manner in which the assessor has applied this statute in the
past may continue receiving any previously established tax rate agreed to by the municipality and
the property owner unless the property owner affirmatively rejects the same. Said prior tax
treatment is transferrable to any subsequent property owner if the conditions of the tax treatment
are met by the new owner to the satisfaction of the assessor.
(e) Creating low-income housing and creating new housing through adaptive reuse are
matters of state-wide concern. For that reason, no city or town shall have the authority to tax
properties qualifying for and utilizing this section at any rate higher than otherwise provided for in
this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001613
========
LC001613 - Page 3 of 4